Wyoming, session 2025, HB0026.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 31-5-1303(a) is amended to read:

31-5-1303. Child safety restraint system; required
use; exception.

HB0026

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0076
(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of
this section, no person shall operate a passenger vehicle
in this state unless each child who is a passenger in that
vehicle and who has not reached his ninth birthday nine (9)
years of age is properly secured in a child safety
restraint system in a seat of the vehicle other than the
front seat, except if the vehicle is only equipped with one
(1) row of seats, or if all safety belts in the rows of
seats behind the front seat are in use by other child
passengers in the vehicle, the a child may be properly
secured in a child safety restraint system in the front
passenger seat of the vehicle, except that a rear-facing
infant seat child safety restraint system shall not be
placed in front of an active airbag. The child safety
restraint system required by this subsection shall be
rear-facing until the child reaches either the age of two
(2) or the maximum weight or height limit specified by the
manufacturer of the child safety restraint system for rear-
facing installation.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0026